Washington statutes.
RCW 39.23.010

Definitions.

As used in RCW 39.23.005 and 39.23.020 the term "sheltered workshops" shall have the meaning ascribed to it by RCW 82.04.385 and "programs of the department of social and health services" shall mean the group training homes and day training centers defined in *RCW 72.33.800 and "municipality" shall have the meaning ascribed to it by RCW 39.04.010.

[ 1975 c 20 s 2.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 72.33.800 was repealed by 1988 c 176 s 1007. See Title 71A RCW.